Hawaii statutes.
[§269-132] Certification. (a) Prior
to installing a high‑voltage electric transmission cable system, a cable
company shall be selected through a request for proposals, or other process
approved by the commission. The selected cable company shall not commence
commercial operations of the high-voltage electric transmission cable system
until it is issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the
commission pursuant to section 269-7.5. A certified cable company shall be
subject to regulation by the commission and defined as a "public utility"
under section 269-1, notwithstanding any law to the contrary.

(b) The electric utility company and the
energy resources coordinator, or the energy resources coordinator's designee,
shall develop the request for proposals, and the energy resources coordinator
or the energy resources coordinator's designee shall be a member of the
selection committee that will review and evaluate the proposals. The electric
utility company shall suspend or terminate the request for proposals at the
discretion of the commission.

(c) Notwithstanding any provisions in section
269-7.5 to the contrary:

(1) The commission shall approve, disapprove, or
approve subject to certain conditions, an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for a high-voltage electric transmission cable
system, and shall issue a final order within one hundred
eighty days after the application is filed, provided that the commission may
extend the timeline as necessary;

(2) In determining whether the cable company is
financially fit, the commission may allow for the use of commercially
reasonable non-recourse project financing for the high-voltage electric
transmission cable system;

(3) In determining whether the proposed transmission
capacity service is or will be required by the present or future public
convenience and necessity, the commission shall determine whether the
high-voltage electric transmission cable system would be a cost‑effective
means of:

(A) Interconnecting two or more electric
utility systems;

(B) Helping one or more electric utility
companies meet the applicable renewable portfolio standard; or

(C) Achieving other considerations the
commission may deem appropriate;

(4) If the primary source or sources of the renewable
electricity that will be transmitted to an electric utility company or
companies using the high-voltage electric transmission cable system will be
provided pursuant to a power purchase agreement or agreements between the
electric utility company or companies and an owner or owners of a new renewable
energy generation facility or facilities, in reviewing and approving the
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the
commission shall, among other factors, take into consideration:

(A) The status of the power purchase
agreement or agreements;

(B) The extent to which the
project-on-project financing risk of the high-voltage electric transmission
cable system and the associated renewable energy generation facilities is
materially reduced through agreements between the certified cable company and
the owner or owners of the renewable energy generation facilities holding the
power purchase agreement or agreements, or through common ownership
arrangements; and

(C) The extent to which the certified cable
company assumes financial responsibility for the high‑voltage electric
transmission cable system until both the cable system and the new generation
facility or facilities have achieved commercial operations;

(5) In the certification process, the commission
shall review and determine ratemaking principles appropriate and applicable to
the high-voltage electric transmission cable system during commercial
operations. The ratemaking principles shall be used in determining the
certified cable company's revenue requirement that is used to determine its
transmission capacity charges, and may be used to fix the capital investment
costs for the high-voltage electric transmission cable system upon which the
certified cable company will be allowed to earn an authorized rate of return
and the operating costs that may be included in the certified cable company's
revenue requirement. Any applicable land costs shall be included in the
determination of the certified cable company's revenue requirement;

(6) In determining the authorized rate of return that
will apply to a certified cable company, the commission may consider the risks
assumed by the certified cable company related to or resulting from the
planning, financing, construction, and
operation of the high-voltage electric transmission cable system, including
other factors deemed relevant and appropriate by the commission, such as the
terms and conditions of the transmission tariff as may be approved by the
commission; and

(7) Prior to approving the application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, the commission shall hold a
public hearing on each island to be connected by the high-voltage electric
transmission cable system to obtain input from the affected communities about
the high-voltage electric transmission cable system. [L 2012, c 165, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next